Washington statutes.
RCW 13.80.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Court-involved youth" means those youth under the age of twenty-one who, within the past twenty-four months:

(a) Have served a court-imposed sentence;

(b) Are or have been on probation or parole; or

(c) Are involved in a legal proceeding in which the youth may be found to have committed a criminal or juvenile offense and are not participating in a diversion agreement under RCW 13.40.080.

(2) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

[ 1994 c 152 s 2.]